Washington statutes.
RCW 35.50.270

Procedure—Sale—Right of redemption.

In foreclosing local improvement assessments, all sales shall be subject to the right of redemption within two years from the date of sale.

[ 1983 c 303 s 22; 1982 c 91 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.50.270. Prior: 1933 c 9 s 2, part; RRS s 9386-1, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 91: See note following RCW 35.50.030.